Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Disclosure: Registration and Reports.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for chapter 108, SLA 2003 (Senate Bill 119), which added or amended various provisions in this chapter, see 2003 Senate Journal 407 — 408.

Sec. 24.45.040.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.041.
Registration; disqualification.

Before engaging in lobbying, a lobbyist shall file a registration statement on a form prescribed by the commission.

The registration form prescribed by the commission must include

the lobbyist’s full name and complete permanent residence and business address and telephone number, as well as any temporary residential and business address and telephone number in the state capital during a legislative session;

the full name and complete address of each person by whom the lobbyist is retained or employed;

whether the person from whom the lobbyist receives compensation employs the person solely as a lobbyist or whether the person is a regular employee performing other services for the employer that include but are not limited to the influencing of legislative or administrative action;

the nature or form of the lobbyist’s compensation for engaging in lobbying, including salary, fees, or reimbursement for expenses received in consideration for, or directly in support of or in connection with, the influencing of legislative or administrative action;

a general description of the subjects or matters on which the registrant expects to lobby or to engage in the influencing of legislative or administrative action;

the full name and complete address of the person, if other than the registrant, who has custody of the accounts, books, papers, bills, receipts, and other documents required to be maintained under this chapter;

the identification of a legislative employee or public official to whom the lobbyist is married or who is the domestic partner of the lobbyist;

a sworn affirmation by the lobbyist that the lobbyist has completed the training course administered by the commission under AS

24.45.031(a)

within the 12-month period preceding the date of registration or registration renewal under this chapter, except that this paragraph does not apply to a person who is a representational lobbyist as defined under regulations of the commission;

a sworn affirmation by the lobbyist that the lobbyist has not been previously convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude; in this paragraph, “felony involving moral turpitude” has the meaning given in AS

15.80.010

, and includes convictions for a violation of the law of this state or a violation of the law of another jurisdiction with elements similar to a felony involving moral turpitude in this state.

At the option of the registrant, the registration form may be accompanied by four two and one-half inch by two and one-half inch black and white photographs of the lobbyist. The photographs may not be more than five years old. These photographs shall be included in the directory published under (e) of this section.

If a change occurs in any of the information contained in a registration statement filed under (a) of this section, or in any accompanying document, an appropriate amendment shall be filed with the commission within 10 days after the change.

Within 15 days after the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the commission shall publish a directory of registered lobbyists, containing the information prescribed in (b) of this section for each lobbyist and the photograph, if any, furnished by a lobbyist under (c) of this section. From time to time thereafter, the commission shall publish those supplements to the directory that in the commission’s judgment may be necessary. The directory shall be made available to public officials and to the public at the following locations: a public place adjacent to the legislative chambers in the state capitol building, the office of the lieutenant governor, the legislative reference library of the Legislative Affairs Agency, and the commission’s central office.

Each lobbyist shall renew the registration annually by filing a new registration statement together with a new authorization to act as a lobbyist before engaging in lobbying. The lobbyist also shall file any reports or statements the lobbyist has failed to file for a previous reporting period. The commission may not renew lobbying credentials until this provision is complied with.

An application for registration as a lobbyist under (a) of this section or for renewal of a registration under (f) of this section is subject to a fee of $250. The commission may not accept an application for registration or renew a registration until the fee is paid. This subsection does not apply to a volunteer lobbyist under AS

24.45.161

or a representational lobbyist under regulations of the commission.

Upon request of the commission, information required under this section shall be submitted electronically.

A person may not register if the person has been previously convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude in violation of a law of this state or the law of another jurisdiction with elements similar to a felony involving moral turpitude in this state.

In this section,

“felony involving moral turpitude” has the meaning given in AS

15.80.010

;

“previously convicted” means the defendant entered a plea of guilty, no contest, or nolo contendere, or has been found guilty by a court or jury; “previously convicted” does not include a conviction that has been set aside under AS

12.55.085

or a similar procedure in another jurisdiction, or that has been reversed or vacated by a court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 39 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 22 SLA 2001; am §§ 20 — 22 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 10 ch 34 SLA 2007; am §§ 12, 13 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (b)(9) and (j)(1) of this section, “AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “AS 15.60.010” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.010.

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.050.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.051.
Reports.

Each lobbyist registered under AS

24.45.041

shall file with the commission a report concerning the lobbyist’s activities during each reporting period prescribed in AS

24.45.081

, so long as the lobbyist continues to engage in lobbying activities. The report shall be made on a form prescribed by the commission and filed in accordance with AS

24.45.071

and

24.45.081

. Upon request of the commission, information required under this section shall be submitted electronically. The report also must include any changes in the information required to be supplied under AS

24.45.041(b)

and the following information for the reporting period, as applicable:

the source of income, as defined in AS

39.50.200(a)

and the monetary value of all payments, including but not limited to salary, fees, and reimbursement of expenses, received in consideration for or directly or indirectly in support of or in connection with influencing legislative or administrative action, and the full name and complete address of each person from whom amounts or things of value have been received and the total monetary value received from each person;

the aggregate amount of disbursements or expenditures made or incurred during the period in support of or in connection with influencing legislative or administrative action by the lobbyist, or on behalf of the lobbyist by the lobbyist’s employer in the following categories:

food and beverages;

living accommodations;

travel;

the date and nature of any gift exceeding $100 in value made to a public official and the full name and official position of that person;

the name and official position of each public official, and the name of each member of the immediate family of any of these officials, with whom the lobbyist has engaged in an exchange of money, goods, services, or anything of more than $100 in value and the nature and date of each of these exchanges and the monetary values exchanged;

the name and address of any business entity in which the lobbyist knows or has reason to know that a public official is a proprietor, partner, director, officer or manager, or has a controlling interest, and whom the lobbyist has engaged in an exchange of money, goods, services, or anything of value and the nature and date of each exchange and the monetary value exchanged if the total value of these exchanges is $100 or more in a calendar year; and

a notice of termination if the lobbyist has ceased the lobbying activity that required registration under this chapter and if this report constitutes the final report of the lobbyist’s activities.

[Repealed, § 13 ch. 61 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 23 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 14 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 13 ch 61 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, repealed (b). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 24.45.060.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.061.
Reports by employers of lobbyists.

Within 15 days after employing, retaining, or contracting for the employment or retention of a lobbyist, the person who employs, retains, or who contracts for the services of a lobbyist shall file a statement with the commission authorizing or verifying that employment, retention, or contract for lobbying services.

A person who employs, retains, or who contracts for the services of one or more lobbyists, whether independently or jointly with other persons, and who directly or indirectly makes payments to influence legislative or administrative action shall file a quarterly report containing

the full name, complete business address and telephone number of the person making the report;

information sufficient to identify the nature and interests of the person making the report;

the total amount of payments made to influence legislative or administrative action during the period, and the name and address of each person to whom these payments have been made during the period by the maker of the report, together with the date and amount;

the date and nature of any gift exceeding $100 in value made to any public official and the full name and official position of the recipient of each gift;

a general description of the legislative or administrative action that the person making the report has attempted to influence;

the name of each lobbyist employed or retained by the person making the report, together with the total amount paid to each lobbyist and the portion of that amount, if any, that was paid for specific purposes, including salary, fees, and reimbursement for expenses; and

a notice of termination if the person filing a report has ceased employing or retaining a lobbyist registered under this chapter and if this report constitutes the final report of the lobbyist’s activities on behalf of the maker of the report.

Upon request of the commission, information required under this section shall be submitted electronically.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 24 ch 108 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.070.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.071.
Certification of reports.

Every statement or report required to be filed under this chapter must identify the full name of the person preparing it, the person’s complete address and telephone number, and shall be certified as complete and correct, both by the person preparing it and by the person on whose behalf it is filed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.080.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.081.
Reporting periods.

Reports required under this chapter shall be filed during the calendar month following each calendar month during any part of which the legislature was in session and during the month following each calendar quarter when the legislature was not in session.
However, if a lobbyist registered under this chapter has declared that the lobbyist seeks only to influence administrative action and not legislative action the lobbyist need only file a report required under this chapter for each calendar quarter.
The period covered shall be the calendar month or the calendar quarter, as applicable, and shall in any event cover the period from the date of the last report filed under this chapter to the date of the end of the calendar month or quarter, as applicable, for which the report is being filed.
The period covered shall not include any months covered in previous reports filed by the same person.
When total amounts are required to be reported, totals shall be stated both for the period covered by the statement and for the entire calendar year to date.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.090.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.091.
Publication of reports.

Copies of the statements and reports filed under this chapter shall be made available to the public at the commission’s central office, the office of the lieutenant governor, the legislative reference library of the Legislative Affairs Agency, and at the commission’s district offices prescribed in AS

15.13.020(j)

as soon as practicable after each reporting period.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Sec. 24.45.100.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.101.
Public records.

Statements and reports filed under this chapter are public records and shall be available for public inspection and copying during normal business hours at the expense of the person requesting copies; however, the charge for copying may not exceed actual cost to the commission.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Sec. 24.45.110.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.111.
Preservation of records.

A person required to register or report as a lobbyist or as a person who employs, retains, or contracts for the services of a lobbyist shall preserve all accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents necessary to substantiate the reports required to be made and filed under this chapter for a period of at least six years from the date of the filing of the report containing these items. These accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and other documents shall be made available for inspection by the commission, or members of its staff, at any time. If a lobbyist is required under the terms of the lobbyist’s employment contract to turn any records over to the employer, responsibility for the preservation of these records under this section rests with the employer.

The commission shall preserve the statements and reports required to be filed under this chapter for a period of six years from the date of filing. If the commission’s central office is not in the state capital, copies of all statements and reports filed under this chapter shall be maintained in an office established by the commission in the state capital or in the office of the lieutenant governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 95 SLA 2008)

Sec. 24.45.116.
Disclosure of contributions.

A civic league or organization shall report the total amount of contributions received for the reporting period and, for any contribution over $100, the name of the contributor and the amount contributed. The civic league or organization may establish a separate fund to account for receipts and expenditures arising out of activities to influence legislative action. Reports shall be made on a form provided by the commission on February 10, April 25, and July 10 of each year, listing contributions received during the period that ended 10 days earlier. Upon request of the commission, information required under this section shall be submitted electronically.

History.

(§ 5 ch 133 SLA 1977; am § 48 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 25 ch 108 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

24.45.121

.
Renumbered in 1977.